Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.070

Public hearing by county legislative authority—Establishment of boundaries—Limitations.

(1) If a county legislative authority holds a public hearing on a proposed incorporation, it shall establish and define the boundaries of the proposed city or town, being authorized to decrease or increase the area proposed in the petition under the same restrictions that a boundary review board may modify the proposed boundaries. The county legislative authority, or the boundary review board if it takes jurisdiction, shall determine the number of inhabitants within the boundaries it has established.

(2) A county legislative authority shall disapprove the proposed incorporation if, without decreasing the area proposed in the petition, it does not conform with RCW 35.02.010. A county legislative authority may not otherwise disapprove a proposed incorporation.

(3) A county legislative authority or boundary review board has jurisdiction only over that portion of a proposed city or town located within the boundaries of the county.

[ 1994 c 216 s 17; 1986 c 234 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.070. Prior: 1963 c 57 s 2; 1957 c 173 s 7; prior: 1890 p 131 s 2, part; 1888 p 221 ss 1, 2, part; 1877 p 173 ss 1, 2, part; 1871 p 51 s 1, part; RRS s 8884, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.

Legislative finding, intent—1975 1st ex.s. c 220: See note following RCW 35.02.170.

Incorporation subject to approval by boundary review board: RCW 36.93.090.